Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201266-910
Solar agreement; wind agreement; manner granted.

Any property owner may grant a solar agreement or
wind agreement in the same manner
and with the same effect as a conveyance of any other interest in real property.

Laws 1979, LB 353, § 10;

Laws 1997, LB 140, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB828, § 6.
March 8, 2012